Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,217
Snowmobiles; fees; disposition.

(1) The county treasurers shall act as agents for the department
in the collection of snowmobile registration fees. Twenty-five cents from
the funds collected for each such registration shall be retained by the county.

(2) The remaining amount of the fees from registration of snowmobiles
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer who shall credit twenty-five percent
to the General Fund and seventy-five percent to the Nebraska Snowmobile Trail
Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 217;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 94.